Utah statutes.
41-6a-210.   Failure to respond to officer's signal to stop -- Fleeing --
Causing property damage or bodily injury -- Suspension of driver's license --
Forfeiture of vehicle -- Penalties.
(1) (a)  An operator who receives a visual or audible signal from a peace
officer to bring the vehicle to a stop may not:
(i)  operate the vehicle in willful or wanton disregard of the signal so as to
interfere with or endanger the operation of any vehicle or person; or
(ii)  attempt to flee or elude a peace officer by vehicle or other means.
(b) (i)  A person who violates Subsection (1)(a) is guilty of a  felony of the
third degree.
(ii)  The court shall, as part of any sentence under this Subsection (1),
impose a fine of not less than $1,000.
(2) (a)  An operator who violates Subsection (1) and while so doing causes
death or serious bodily injury to another person, under circumstances not
amounting to murder or aggravated murder, is guilty of a felony of the second
degree.
(b)  The court shall, as part of any sentence under this Subsection (2),
impose a fine of not less than $5,000.
(3) (a)  In addition to the penalty provided under this section or any other
section, a person who violates Subsection (1)(a) or (2)(a) shall have the
person's driver license revoked under Subsection 53-3-220(1)(a)(ix) for a
period of one year.
(b) (i)  The court shall forward the report of the conviction to the division.
(ii)  If the person is the holder of a driver license from another
jurisdiction, the division shall notify the appropriate officials in the
licensing state.
